Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1118.04
Materiel division; purposes.

The purposes of the materiel division are to maximize the state's purchasing power through an efficient and standardized state procurement system and centralized office services and supply program and to maximize the utilization of and control the inventory of state-owned equipment.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 40;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 29.